Hawaii statutes.
§432:2-610 Unfair methods of competition
and unfair and deceptive acts and practices. Every society authorized to
do business in this State shall be subject to the provisions of article 13 of
the insurance code relating to unfair practices; provided, however, that
nothing in such provisions shall be construed as applying to or affecting the
right of any society to determine its eligibility requirements for membership,
or be construed as applying to or affecting the offering of benefits
exclusively to members [or] persons eligible for membership in the society by a
subsidiary corporation or affiliated organization of the society. [L 1987, c
347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next